California statutes. Education Code
When a governing board has adopted a resolution pursuant to Section 35110, the length of service of each employee shall be counted from the original date of employment by either school district under the jurisdiction of the governing board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Officers and Agents [35120. - 35124.]

35120.

(a) (1) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year exceeded 250,000, each regular member of the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a salary as set forth by the local city charter law or applicable rules and regulations and as determined by a local compensation review committee.

(2) In a school district that is not located in a city and county, and in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year exceeded 60,000, the governing board may prescribe, as compensation for the services of each regular member of the board who
 attends all meetings held, a sum not to exceed four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500) in any month.

(3) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year was 60,000 or less, but more than 25,000, each regular member of the city board of education or the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed three thousand
 dollars ($3,000) in any month.

(4) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year was 25,000 or less, but more than 10,000, each regular member of the city board of education or the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) in any month.

(5) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year was 10,000 or less, but more than 1,000, each regular member of the city board of
 education or the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) in any month.

(6) In a school district in which the average daily attendance for the prior school year was 1,000 or less, each regular member of the city board of education or the governing board of the school district who attends all meetings held may receive as compensation for the regular member’s services a sum not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) in any month.

(7) A regular member or pupil member who does not attend all meetings held in any month may receive, as compensation for the regular member’s or pupil member’s services, an amount not greater than the maximum amount allowed by this subdivision or paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), as applicable, divided by the number of meetings held and multiplied by the number of meetings attended.

(8) For purposes of providing compensation pursuant to paragraphs
 (1) to
 (6), inclusive, average daily attendance for the prior school year may be increased by a school district’s percentage of excused absences reported for the 1996–97 fiscal year.

(b) The compensation of regular members of the governing board of a school district newly organized or reorganized shall be governed by subdivision (a). For this purpose, the total average daily attendance in all of the schools of the school district in the school year in which the organization or reorganization became effective shall be considered the average daily attendance in the school district for the prior school year.

(c) A pupil member or regular member may be paid for any
 meeting when absent if the board, by resolution duly adopted and included in its minutes, finds that at the time of the meeting the member is performing services outside the meeting for the school district or districts, the member was ill or on jury duty, or the absence was due to a hardship considered acceptable by the board.

(d) Compensation provided pursuant to this section shall be a charge against the funds of the school district. If the city board of education or the governing board of the school district is the governing board of more than one school district, the compensation shall be charged against and paid by the respective school districts in the same proportion as the salary of the city superintendent of schools is charged against them. Compensation shall be reduced by an amount equal to any salary or compensation
 paid to the members of the city board of education from any funds of the city.

(e) On an annual basis, the governing board may increase the compensation of regular members beyond the limits delineated in this section, in an amount not to exceed 5 percent based on the present monthly rate of compensation. An increase made pursuant to this subdivision shall be effective upon approval by the governing board.

(f) The governing board of a school district may award a pupil member either or both of the following:

(1) Elective course credit based on the number of equivalent daily instructional minutes for the pupil member’s services provided.

(2) Monthly
 financial compensation as determined by the governing board.

(g) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Pupil member” means a pupil board member appointed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 35012.

(2) “Regular member” means a board member elected or selected pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 35012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 639, Sec. 2.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35120.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and to the extent permitted by federal law, any compensation awarded to a pupil member pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 35120 shall not be considered as income or resources when determining eligibility and benefit amount for any means-tested program, including, but not limited to, CalWORKs, General Assistance, Medi-Cal, and Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI), and any scholarships for public colleges and universities, including, but not limited to, Cal Grant awards, Chafee grant awards, Middle Class Scholarship Program awards, California College Promise Grants, California State University Educational Opportunity Program (EOP) grants, Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services (EOPS) grants, and grants from the University of California
 or the California State University.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section for programs under its jurisdiction by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.

(c) This section shall apply to programs under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Social Services beginning on the date that the State Department of Social Services notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary
 automation to implement this section for those programs. The department shall issue guidance as necessary to begin automation no later than July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 686, Sec. 2.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35121.

In any school district organized under the provisions of Section 35502 and which is also a high school district, and which districts are governed by a board of school trustees, and which districts have an average daily attendance in the elementary school district of at least 800, as shown by the last report of the principal of schools in the elementary school district, on file in the office of the county superintendent of schools, the trustees of the school district may appoint a clerk, who shall not be one of their own number, to act for the elementary district trustees and the high school district trustees to hold office at the pleasure of the board of trustees. The board may fix the salary of the clerk at a sum not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25) per month for the two districts, which shall be paid in the same manner and from the same funds as other incidental expenses of the districts are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35124.

The superintendent of schools of a unified school district that is coterminous with the boundaries of a city and county shall have all the powers and duties set forth in this code for a superintendent of any school district of the class of school that is included within the unified school district and also shall perform the duties of the county superintendent. The superintendent shall have his or her compensation fixed and ordered paid by the board of education, anything in a city, county, or city and county charter to the contrary notwithstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 194.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Meetings [35140. - 35150.]

35140.

Subject to the provisions of this article the governing board of any school district shall by rule and regulation fix the time and place for its regular meetings. Such action shall be proper notice to all members of the board of the regular meetings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35141.

The governing board of any union or joint union high school district, shall hold its regular meetings either monthly or quarterly. The governing board of any other high school district, shall hold its regular meetings monthly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35142.

Subject to the provisions of Section 35141, the times at which the regular meetings of the governing board of a high school district are to be held shall be prescribed by the rules and regulations adopted by such board for its own government.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35143.

(a) The governing board of each school district shall hold an annual organizational meeting. In a year in which a regular election for governing board members is conducted, the meeting shall be held on a day within a 15-day period that commences with the second Friday in December following the regular election. Organizational meetings in years in which no such regular election for governing board members is conducted shall be held on any date in December, but no later than December 20. Unless otherwise provided by rule of the governing board, the day and time of the annual meeting shall be selected, in a year in which a regular election for governing board members is conducted, by the board at its regular meeting held immediately before the first day of such 15-day period, or in a year in
 which no such regular election for governing board members is conducted, by the board at its last regular meeting held immediately before the organizational meeting. The board shall notify the county superintendent of schools of the day and time selected. The clerk of the board shall, within 15 days before the date of the annual meeting, notify in writing all members and members-elect of the date and time selected for the meeting.

(b) If the board fails to select a day and time for the meeting, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district shall, before the first day of such 15-day period and after the regular meeting of the board held immediately before the first day of such 15-day period, designate the day and time of the annual meeting. The day designated shall be within the 15-day period. The county superintendent of schools shall notify in writing all members and members-elect of the date and time.

(c) At the annual meeting the governing board of each high school district, union high school district, and joint union high school district shall organize by electing a president from its members and a clerk.

(d) At the annual meeting each city board of education shall organize by electing a president from its members.

(e) At the annual meeting the governing board of each other type of school district, except a community college district, shall elect one of its members clerk of the district.

(f) As an alternative to the procedures set forth in this section, a city board of education whose members are elected in accordance with a city charter for terms of office commencing in December, may hold its annual organizational meeting required in this section
 between December 15 and January 14, inclusive, as provided in rules and regulations that shall be adopted by such board. At the annual meeting the city board of education shall organize by electing a president and vice president from its members who shall serve in such office during the period January 15 next to the following January 14, unless removed from such office by majority vote of all members of the city board of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 24.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

35144.

A special meeting of the governing board of a school district may be called at any time by the presiding officer of the board, or by a majority of the members thereof, by delivering personally or by mail written notice to each member of the board, and to each local newspaper of general circulation, radio, or television station requesting notice in writing. The notice shall be delivered personally or by mail at least 24 hours before the time of the meeting as specified in the notice. The call and notice shall specify the time and place of the special meeting and the business to be transacted. No other business shall be considered at those meetings by the governing board. The written notice may be dispensed with as to any member who at or prior to the time the meeting convenes files with the clerk or secretary of the board a written waiver of notice. The waiver may be given by telegram. The written notice may also be dispensed with as to any member who is actually present at the meeting at the time it convenes.

The call and notice shall be posted at least 24 hours prior to the special meeting in a location that is freely accessible to members of the public and district employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 641, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35145.

All meetings of the governing board of any school district shall be open to the public and shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. All actions authorized or required by law of the governing board shall be taken at the meetings and shall be subject to the following requirements:

(a) Minutes shall be taken at all of those meetings, recording all actions taken by the governing board. The minutes are public records and shall be available to the public.

(b) An agenda shall be posted by the governing board, or its designee, in accordance with the requirements of Section 54954.2 of the Government Code. Any interested person may commence an action by mandamus or injunction pursuant to Section 54960.1 of the Government Code for the purpose of obtaining a judicial determination that any action taken by the governing board in violation of this subdivision or Section 35144 is null and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

35145.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that members of the public be able to place matters directly related to school district business on the agenda of school district governing board meetings. Every agenda for regular meetings shall provide an opportunity for members of the public to directly address the governing board on any item of interest to the public, before or during the governing board’s consideration of the item, that is within the subject matter jurisdiction of the governing board. Governing boards shall adopt reasonable regulations to insure that this intent is carried out. The regulations may specify reasonable procedures to insure the proper functioning of governing board meetings.

This subdivision shall not preclude the taking of testimony at regular meetings on matters not on the agenda which any member of the public may wish to bring before the board, provided that, except as authorized by Section 54954.2 of the Government Code, no action is taken by the board on those matters at the same meeting at which the testimony is taken. Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to limit further discussion on the same subject matter at a subsequent meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   Effective July 21, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

35146.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 35145 of this code and Section 54950 of the Government Code, the governing body of a school district shall, unless a request by the parent has been made pursuant to this section, hold closed sessions if the board is considering the suspension of, or disciplinary action or any other action except expulsion in connection with any pupil of the school district, if a public hearing upon such question would lead to the giving out of information concerning school pupils which would be in violation of Article 5 (commencing with Section 49073) of Chapter 6.5 of Part 27 of this code.

Before calling such closed session of the governing board of the district to consider these matters, the governing board of the district shall, in writing, by registered or certified mail or by personal service, if the pupil is a minor, notify the pupil and his or her parent or guardian, or the pupil if the pupil is an adult, of the intent of the governing board of the district to call and hold such closed session. Unless the pupil, or his or her parent, or guardian shall, in writing, within 48 hours after receipt of such written notice of intention, request that the hearing of the governing board be held as a public meeting, then the hearing to consider such matters shall be conducted by the governing board in closed session. If such written request is served upon the clerk or secretary of the governing board, the meeting shall be public except that any discussion at such meeting that might be in conflict with the right to privacy of any pupil other than the pupil requesting the public meeting or on behalf of whom such meeting is requested, shall be in closed session. Whether the matter is considered at a closed session or at a public meeting, the final action of the governing board of the school district shall be taken at a public meeting and the result of such action shall be a public record of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1284, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35147.

(a) Except as specified in this section, any meeting of the councils or committees specified in subdivision (b) is exempt from the provisions of this article, the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) The councils and advisory committees established pursuant to Sections 52063, 52069, and 52176, subdivision (b) of Section 54425, Sections 54444.2, 56190, 62002.5, and 65000, and the committees formed pursuant to Section 11503 are subject to this section.

(c) (1) Any
 meeting held by a council or committee specified in subdivision (b) shall be open to the public, and any member of the public shall be able to address the council or committee during the meeting on any item within the subject matter jurisdiction of the council or committee. Notice of the meeting shall be posted at the schoolsite, or other appropriate place accessible to the public, at least 72 hours before the time set for the meeting. The notice shall specify the date, time, and location of the meeting and contain an agenda describing each item of business to be discussed or acted upon. The council or committee may not take any action on any item of business unless that item appeared on the posted agenda or unless the council or committee members present, by unanimous vote, find that there is a need to take immediate action and that the need for action came to the attention of the council or committee subsequent to the posting of the agenda.

(2) Questions or brief statements made at a meeting by members of the council, committee, or public that do not have a significant effect on pupils or employees in the school or school district, or that can be resolved solely by the provision of information, need not be described on an agenda as items of business. If a council or committee violates the procedural meeting requirements of this section, upon demand of any person, the council or committee shall reconsider the item at its next meeting, after allowing for public input on the item.

(d) Any materials provided to a schoolsite council shall be made available to any member of the public who requests the materials pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 67) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 1.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

35149.

The first meeting of any newly elected or appointed school district governing board, and any annual meeting required by law to be held by such board for purposes of its organization, shall be deemed a regular meeting of the board for purposes of any requirement of law that periodic meetings shall be held by such board, and the regular business of the board may be transacted at such a meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35150.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district shall not take action to terminate a superintendent or assistant superintendent of the school district, or both, without cause, at a special or emergency meeting of the governing board.

(2) The governing board of a school district may hold a regular meeting pursuant to Section 54954 of the Government Code for the purpose of terminating a superintendent or assistant
 superintendent of the school district, or both, without cause, during any month in which a regular meeting of the governing board is not scheduled.

(b) The governing board of a school district shall not terminate a superintendent or assistant superintendent of the school district, or both, without cause, within 30 days after the first convening of the governing board after an election at which one or more members of the governing board are elected or recalled.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.   (SB 494)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties [35160. - 35178.4.]

35160.

On and after January 1, 1976, the governing board of any school district may initiate and carry on any program, activity, or may otherwise act in any manner which is not in conflict with or inconsistent with, or preempted by, any law and which is not in conflict with the purposes for which school districts are established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35160.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that school districts, county boards of education, and county superintendents of schools have diverse needs unique to their individual communities and programs. Moreover, in addressing their needs, common as well as unique, school districts, county boards of education, and county superintendents of schools should have the flexibility to create their own unique solutions.

(b) In enacting Section 35160, it is the intent of the Legislature to give school districts, county boards of education, and county superintendents of schools broad authority to carry on activities and programs, including the expenditure of funds for programs and activities which, in the determination of the governing board of the school district, the county board of education, or the county superintendent of schools are necessary or desirable in meeting their needs and are not inconsistent with the purposes for which the funds were appropriated. It is the intent of the Legislature that Section 35160 be liberally construed to effect this objective.

(c) The Legislature further declares that the adoption of this section is a clarification of existing law under Section 35160.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 199.)
-------------------------------------------

35160.2.

For the purposes of Section 35160, “school district” shall include county superintendents of schools and county boards of education.

This section shall be interpreted to be declaratory of existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1124, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35160.5.

(a) The governing board of a school district that maintains one or more schools containing any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, as a condition for the receipt of inflation adjustments pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, shall establish a school district policy regarding participation in extracurricular and cocurricular activities by pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive. The criteria, which shall be applied to extracurricular and cocurricular activities, shall ensure that pupil participation is conditioned upon satisfactory educational progress in the previous grading period.

(1) For purposes of this subdivision, “extracurricular activity” means a program that
 has all of the following characteristics:

(A) The program is supervised or financed by the school district.

(B) Pupils participating in the program represent the school district.

(C) Pupils exercise some degree of freedom in either the selection, planning, or control of the program.

(D) The program includes both preparation for performance and performance before an audience or spectators.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an “extracurricular activity” is not part of the regular school curriculum, is not graded, does not offer credit, and does not take place during classroom time.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a “cocurricular activity” is defined as a program that may be associated with the curriculum in a regular classroom.

(4) A teacher-graded or required program or activity for a course that satisfies the entrance requirements for admission to the California State University or the University of California is not an extracurricular or cocurricular activity as defined by this section.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “satisfactory educational progress” shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, both of the following:

(A) Maintenance of minimum passing grades, which is defined as at least a 2.0 grade point average
 in all enrolled courses on a 4.0 scale.

(B) Maintenance of minimum progress toward meeting the high school graduation requirements prescribed by the governing board.

(6) For purposes of this subdivision, “previous grading period” does not include a grading period in which the pupil was not in attendance for all, or a majority of, the grading period due to absences excused by the school for reasons such as serious illness or injury, approved travel, or work. In that event, “previous grading period” means the grading period immediately before the grading period or periods excluded pursuant to this paragraph.

(7) A program that has, as its primary goal, the improvement of academic or educational achievements of pupils is
 not an extracurricular or cocurricular activity as defined by this section.

(8) (A) The governing board of each school district may adopt, as part of its policy established pursuant to this subdivision, provisions that would allow a pupil who does not achieve satisfactory educational progress, as defined in paragraph (5), in the previous grading period to remain eligible to participate in extracurricular and cocurricular activities during a probationary period. The probationary period shall not exceed one semester in length, but may be for a shorter period of time, as determined by the governing board of the school district. A pupil who does not achieve satisfactory educational progress, as defined in paragraph (5), during the probationary period shall not be allowed to participate in extracurricular and cocurricular
 activities in the subsequent grading period.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the governing board of each school district may adopt a policy that would allow a probationary period to exceed one semester in length through the completion of the 2020–21 school year due to the impact of COVID-19.

(9) This subdivision does not preclude the governing board of a school district from imposing a more stringent academic standard than that imposed by this subdivision. If the governing board of a school district imposes a more stringent academic standard, the governing board shall establish the criteria for participation in extracurricular and cocurricular activities at a meeting open to the public pursuant to Section 35145.

(10) The governing board of each school district annually shall review the school district policies adopted pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(b) (1) On or before July 1, 1994, the governing board of each school district, as a condition for the receipt of school apportionments from the State School Fund, shall adopt rules and regulations establishing a policy of open enrollment within the district for residents of the district. This requirement does not apply to a school district that has only one school or a school district with schools that do not serve any of the same grade levels.

(2) The policy shall include all of the following elements:

(A) It shall provide that the parent or
 guardian of each schoolage child who is a resident in the district may select the schools the child shall attend, irrespective of the particular locations of the child’s residence within the district, except that school districts shall retain the authority to maintain appropriate racial and ethnic balances among their respective schools at the school districts’ discretion or as specified in applicable court-ordered or voluntary desegregation plans.

(B) It shall include a selection policy for a school that receives requests for admission in excess of the capacity of the school that ensures that selection of pupils to enroll in the school is made through a random, unbiased process that prohibits an evaluation of whether a pupil should be enrolled based upon the pupil’s academic or athletic performance. The governing board of a school district
 shall calculate the capacity of the schools in the district for purposes of this subdivision in a nonarbitrary manner using pupil enrollment and available space. However, school districts may employ existing entrance criteria for specialized schools or programs if the criteria are uniformly applied to all applicants. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit school districts from using academic performance to determine eligibility for, or placement in, programs for gifted and talented pupils established pursuant to former Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 52200) of Part 28 of Division 4, as that chapter read on January 1, 2014.

(C) It shall provide that a pupil who currently resides in the attendance area of a school shall not be displaced by pupils transferring from outside the attendance area.

(3) Notwithstanding the requirement of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) that the policy include a selection policy for a school that receives requests for admission in excess of the capacity of the school that ensures that the selection is made through a random, unbiased process, the policy may include either of the following elements:

(A) (i) It may provide that special circumstances exist that might be harmful or dangerous to a particular pupil in the current attendance area of the pupil, including, but not necessarily limited to, threats of bodily harm or threats to the emotional stability of the pupil, that serve as a basis for granting a priority of attendance outside the current attendance area of the pupil. A finding of harmful or dangerous special
 circumstances shall be based upon either of the following:

(I) A written statement from a representative of the appropriate state or local agency, including, but not necessarily limited to, a law enforcement official or a social worker, or properly licensed or registered professionals, including, but not necessarily limited to, psychiatrists, psychologists, marriage and family therapists, clinical social workers, or professional clinical counselors.

(II) A court order, including a temporary restraining order and injunction, issued by a judge.

(ii) A finding of harmful or dangerous special circumstances pursuant to this subparagraph may be used by a school district to approve transfers within the district to schools that
 have been deemed by the school district to be at capacity and otherwise closed to transfers that are not based on harmful or dangerous special circumstances.

(B) It may provide that schools receiving requests for admission shall give priority for attendance to siblings of pupils already in attendance in that school and to pupils whose parent or legal guardian is assigned to that school as their primary place of
 employment.

(4) To the extent required and financed by federal law and at the request of the pupil’s parent or guardian, each school district shall provide transportation assistance to the pupil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.   (AB 908)   Effective September 11, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

35161.

The governing board of any school district may execute any powers delegated by law to it or to the district of which it is the governing board, and shall discharge any duty imposed by law upon it or upon the district of which it is the governing board, and may delegate to an officer or employee of the district any of those powers or duties. The governing board, however, retains ultimate responsibility over the performance of those powers or duties so delegated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 200.)
-------------------------------------------

35162.

In the name by which the district is designated the governing board may sue and be sued, and hold and convey property for the use and benefit of the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35163.

Every official action taken by the governing board of every school district shall be affirmed by a formal vote of the members of the board, and the governing board of every school district shall keep minutes of its meetings, and shall maintain a journal of its proceedings in which shall be recorded every official act taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35164.

The governing board shall act by majority vote of all of the membership constituting the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35165.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a school district governing board consists of seven (7) members and not more than two vacancies occur on the governing board, the vacant position or positions shall not be counted for purposes of determining how many members of the board constitute a majority; and, whenever any of the provisions of this code require unanimous action of all or a specific number of the members elected or appointed to the governing board, the vacant position or positions shall be excluded from determination of the total membership constituting the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35166.

The governing board of each unified school district shall have the same powers and duties as are by law granted to the governing boards of the elementary school districts, and high school districts.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35167.

Except where otherwise provided, all of the provisions of this code applicable to the government, maintenance, support, functions, and administration of elementary and high school districts are applicable to the government, maintenance, support, and administration of unified school districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

35168.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district, shall establish and maintain a historical inventory, an audit trace inventory system, or any other inventory system authorized by the
 state board that
 shall contain the description, name, identification number, date of acquisition, location of use, and original cost, of each item of equipment acquired by the school district that has a current market value
 that exceeds
 one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) per item.

(2) The governing board of a school district shall also include the date and manner of disposal for each item of equipment in the inventory system maintained pursuant to paragraph (1) upon disposal of the item.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (1), if a school district does not know the original cost of an item, the school district may use a
 reasonable estimate of the original cost.

(b) (1) The Superintendent shall biennially adjust the threshold market value identified in subdivision (a) by the percentage calculated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02 for the 12-month period ending in the prior fiscal year, rounded to the nearest fifty dollars ($50).

(2) The Superintendent shall post the adjusted threshold market value calculated in paragraph (1) to the department’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.   (AB 629)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

35170.

The governing board of any school district may secure copyrights, in the name of the district, to all copyrightable works developed by the school district, and royalties or revenue from said copyrights are to be for the benefit of the school district securing said copyrights.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35171.

The governing board of any school district shall adopt and cause to be printed and made available to each certificated employee of the district reasonable rules and regulations providing for the evaluation of the performance of certificated employees in their assigned duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

35172.

The governing board of any school district may:
